Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.210

Order terminating parent and child relationship—Custody where no one has parental rights.

If, upon entering an order terminating the parental rights of a parent, there remains no parent having parental rights, the court shall commit the child to the custody of the department willing to accept custody for the purpose of placing the child for adoption. If an adoptive home has not been identified, the department shall place the child in a licensed foster home, or take other suitable measures for the care and welfare of the child. The placement standards provided in RCW 13.34.130 continue to apply throughout the life of the case, except that the court need not consider whether reunification with the parent will be hindered when evaluating relative placements. The custodian shall have authority to consent to the adoption of the child consistent with chapter 26.33 RCW, the marriage of the child, the enlistment of the child in the armed forces of the United States, necessary surgical and other medical treatment for the child, and to consent to such other matters as might normally be required of the parent of the child.

If a child has not been adopted within six months after the date of the order and a guardianship of the child under chapter 13.36 RCW or a guardianship of a minor under RCW 11.130.215 has not been entered by the court, the court shall review the case every six months until a decree of adoption is entered. The department shall take reasonable steps to ensure that the child maintains relationships with siblings as provided in RCW 13.34.130(7) and shall report to the court the status and extent of such relationships.

[ 2022 c 127 s 3; 2020 c 312 s 120; 2018 c 284 s 21; 2010 c 272 s 13. Prior: 2009 c 520 s 35; 2009 c 152 s 2; 2003 c 227 s 8; 2000 c 122 s 28; 1991 c 127 s 6; 1988 c 203 s 2; 1979 c 155 s 49; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 49.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.

Intent—2003 c 227: See note following RCW 13.34.130.

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.